Utah statutes.
11-13-214.   Conveyance or acquisition of property by public agency.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, any public agency may convey property to or acquire property from any other public agency for consideration as may be agreed upon.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

